Mississippi statutes. Title 69. Agriculture, Horticulture, and Animals
Chapter 49. Field Crop Products

§ 69-49-1.
Liability for destruction of field crop products; factors in awarding damages; limitation of damages; definition of “field crop”.

Any person or entity who willfully and knowingly damages or destroys any field crop product that is grown for personal or commercial purposes, or for testing or research purposes in the context of a product development program in conjunction or coordination with a private research facility or a university or any federal, state or local government agency, shall be liable for twice the value of the crop damaged or destroyed.

In awarding damages under this section, the courts shall consider the market value of the crop prior to damage or destruction and production, research, testing, replacement and crop development costs directly related to the crop that has been damaged or destroyed as part of the value of the crop.

Damages available under this section shall be limited to twice the market value of the crop prior to damage or destruction plus twice the actual damages involving production, research, testing, replacement and crop development costs directly related to the crop that has been damaged or destroyed.

For the purposes of this section, “field crop” means any product grown, developed or raised for purposes, including, but not limited to, human or animal consumption, research, industrial, commercial or pharmacological purposes.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2001, ch. 355, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2001.